zh-TW: 觸控功能: 雙重; 多重; 單倍; 其他
pt-BR: Recursos de toque: Dual; Multi; Único; Outro
nb: Berøringsfunksjoner: Dobbel; Multi; Enkel; Annet
it: Funzionalità touch: Doppie; Multiple; Singolo; Altro
bg-BG: Сензорни възможности: Двоен; Мулти; Единично; Други
pt-PT: Capacidades do tátil: Duplo; Multi; Único; Outro
th: ความสามารถในการสัมผัส: คู่; มัลติ; แบบเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
sv: Touch-funktioner: Dubbel; Multi; Enkel; Övrigt
vi: Khả năng cảm ứng: Hai nhiệt độ; Nhiều; Đơn; Khác
fi: Kosketusominaisuudet: Kaksiosainen; Monikosketus; Yksittäinen; Muu
cs: Dotykové funkce: Duální; Více funkcí; Jedna funkce; Jiné
fr: Capacités tactiles: Double; Multi; Unique; Autre
tr: Dokunma Özellikleri: Çift; Multi; Tek; Diğer
ko: 터치 기능: 듀얼; 멀티; 싱글; 기타
de: Touch-Funktionen: Zwei; Multi; Einzel; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Jutiklinės funkcijos: Dual; Multi; Single; Kita
nl: Aanraakmogelijkheden: Dubbel; Multi; Single; Andere
ru: Возможности сенсорного экрана: Двойной; Мульти; Однократный; Другое
ja: タッチ機能: デュアル; マルチ; シングル; その他
zh-CN: 触摸功能: 双温区; 多; 单; 其他
es: Capacidades táctiles: Doble; Multi; Individual; Otros
sk-SK: Dotykové možnosti: Dvojitý; Viacnásobný; Jeden; Iné
el: Δυνατότητες αφής: Διπλός; Multi; Μονό; Άλλο
pl: Możliwości dotykowe: Dual; Multi; Singiel; Inne
hu: Érintési funkciók: Kettős; Több; Egyes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Mogućnosti dodira: Dvostruka; Multi; Jednostruka; Ostalo
sl-SI: Zmogljivosti na dotik: Dvojno; Multi; Enojn; Drugo
ro-RO: Capacități tactile: Duale; Multi; Simplu; Altele
en: Touch capabilities: Dual; Multi; Single; Other
da: Berøringsfunktioner: Dobbelt; Multi; Enkelt; Andet